Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 2. PUBLIC EDUCATION

SUBTITLE C. LOCAL ORGANIZATION AND GOVERNANCE

CHAPTER 19. SCHOOLS IN THE TEXAS DEPARTMENT OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE

Sec. 19.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the Texas Board of Criminal Justice.

(2) "Department" means the Texas Department of Criminal Justice.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 19.002. ESTABLISHMENT. The school district established by the Texas Board of Corrections in 1969 shall be known as the Windham School District, an entity that is separate and distinct from the Texas Department of Criminal Justice. The district may establish and operate schools at the various facilities of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 19.0022. SUNSET PROVISION. The Windham School District is subject to review under Chapter 325, Government Code (Texas Sunset Act). The district shall be reviewed during the period in which the Texas Department of Criminal Justice is reviewed.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 19.003. GOALS OF THE DISTRICT. The goals of the district in educating its students are to:

(1) reduce recidivism;

(2) reduce the cost of confinement or imprisonment;

(3) increase the success of former inmates in obtaining and maintaining employment; and

(4) provide an incentive to inmates to behave in positive ways during confinement or imprisonment.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 19.004. GOVERNANCE, LIMITATION ON POWERS, AND DUTIES. (a) The district shall be governed as provided by this chapter and policies established by the board. Unless otherwise specifically provided, a provision of this code applying to school districts does not apply to the district.

(b) The district may not impose a tax.

(c) The district shall:

(1) develop educational programs specifically designed for persons eligible under Section 19.005 and ensure that those programs, such as GED and ESL, are integrated with an applied vocational context leading to employment;

(1-a) develop vocational training programs specifically designed for persons eligible under Section 19.005 and prioritize the programs that result in certification or licensure, considering the impact that a previous felony conviction has on the ability to secure certification, licensure, and employment;

(1-b) continually assess job markets in this state and update, augment, and expand the vocational training programs developed under Subdivision (1-a) as necessary to provide relevant and marketable skills to students; and

(2) coordinate educational programs and services in the department with those provided by other state agencies, by political subdivisions, and by persons who provide programs and services under contract.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1142 (H.B. 2837), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 274 (H.B. 799), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 19.0041. PROGRAM DATA COLLECTION AND BIENNIAL EVALUATION AND REPORT. (a) To evaluate the effectiveness of its programs, the Windham School District shall compile and analyze information for each of its programs, including performance-based information and data related to academic, vocational training, and life skills programs. This information shall include for each person who participates in district programs an evaluation of:

(1) institutional disciplinary violations;

(2) subsequent arrests;

(3) subsequent convictions or confinements;

(4) the cost of confinement;

(5) educational achievement;

(6) high school equivalency examination passage;

(7) the kind of training services provided;

(8) the kind of employment the person obtains on release;

(9) whether the employment was related to training;

(10) the difference between the amount of the person's earnings on the date employment is obtained following release and the amount of those earnings on the first anniversary of that date; and

(11) the retention factors associated with the employment.

(b) The Windham School District shall use the information compiled and analyzed under Subsection (a) to biennially:

(1) evaluate whether its programs meet the goals under Section 19.003 and make changes to the programs as necessary; and

(2) submit a report to the board, the legislature, and the governor's office.

(c) The Windham School District may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the department, the Department of Public Safety, and the Texas Workforce Commission to obtain and share data necessary to evaluate district programs.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1142 (H.B. 2837), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 28, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 19.0042. INFORMATION TO BE PROVIDED BY DISTRICT BEFORE VOCATIONAL TRAINING PROGRAM ENROLLMENT. Before a person described by Section 19.005 enrolls in a district vocational training program, the district must inform the person in writing of:

(1) any rule or policy of a state agency that would impose a restriction or prohibition on the person in obtaining a certificate or license in connection with the vocational training program;

(2) the total number of district students released during the preceding 10 years who have completed a district vocational training program that allows for an opportunity to apply for a certificate or license from a state agency and, of those students:

(A) the number who have applied for a certificate or license from a state agency;

(B) the number who have been issued a certificate or license by a state agency; and

(C) the number who have been denied a certificate or license by a state agency; and

(3) the procedures for:

(A) requesting a criminal history evaluation letter under Section 53.102, Occupations Code;

(B) providing evidence of fitness to perform the duties and discharge the responsibilities of a licensed occupation for purposes of Section 53.023, Occupations Code; and

(C) appealing a state agency's denial of a certificate or license, including deadlines and due process requirements:

(i) to the State Office of Administrative Hearings under Subchapter C, Chapter 2001, Government Code; and

(ii) through any other available avenue.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 273 (H.B. 797), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 19.0043. CREDIT FOR COMPLETION OF EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS; HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA AND CERTIFICATE. (a) A school district shall grant credit to a student toward the academic, career and technology, or other course requirements for high school graduation for courses the student successfully completes in the Windham School District educational programs, provided that the completed courses meet the standards adopted under Section 28.002(c).

(b) A student may graduate and receive a diploma from a Windham School District educational program if:

(1) the student successfully completes the curriculum requirements identified by the State Board of Education under Section 28.025(a) and complies with Section 39.025; or

(2) the student successfully completes the curriculum requirements under Section 28.025(a) as modified by an individualized education program developed under Section 29.005.

(c) A Windham School District educational program may issue a certificate of coursework completion to a student who successfully completes the curriculum requirements identified by the State Board of Education under Section 28.025(a) but who fails to comply with Section 39.025.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 44 (S.B. 1024), Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 2015.

Sec. 19.005. ELIGIBILITY FOR CERTAIN PROGRAMS AND SERVICES. (a) Any person confined or imprisoned in the department who is not a high school graduate is eligible for programs or services under this chapter paid for with money from the foundation school fund. To the extent space is available, the district may also offer programs or services under this chapter paid for with money from the foundation school fund to persons confined or imprisoned in the department who are high school graduates.

(b) Eligibility under this chapter does not make a person eligible for a program or service under any other chapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1188, Sec. 1.51, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 19.0051. EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS. (a) The Windham School District shall develop and provide an educational program that includes the curriculum requirements for a high school diploma under Section 28.025 or a course of instruction that prepares the person for the high school equivalency examination to each person confined or imprisoned in the department who is not a high school graduate and is:

(1) younger than 18 years of age; or

(2) eligible to receive special education services under Subchapter A, Chapter 29, and younger than 22 years of age.

(b) In developing a person's educational program under Subsection (a), the Windham School District shall consider:

(1) the duration of the person's confinement or imprisonment;

(2) the person's current level of education;

(3) the person's educational goals and preference; and

(4) if applicable, recommendations of the person's admission, review, and dismissal committee.

(c) The board may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 444 (H.B. 30), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 19.0052. ADULT EDUCATION PILOT PROGRAM. (a) The Windham School District shall establish a pilot program under which one or more nonprofit entities provide an adult education program under Subchapter G, Chapter 12, to enable persons described by Subsection (b) to successfully complete a high school program that can lead to a diploma.

(b) A person confined or imprisoned in the department who is at least 26 years of age and not more than 50 years of age is eligible to enroll in an adult education program operated under the pilot program if the person:

(1) has failed to complete the curriculum requirements for high school graduation;

(2) has failed to perform satisfactorily on an assessment instrument required for high school graduation; or

(3) has failed to earn a high school equivalency certificate.

(c) The district shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with at least one nonprofit entity described by Section 12.256, Education Code, to provide an adult education program under the pilot program. The district shall require the nonprofit entity to identify each region of this state in which the entity is able to operate an adult education program under the pilot program.

(d) The district, in consultation with each nonprofit entity with which the district enters into a memorandum of understanding under this section, shall identify at least three schools operated by the district that are suitable to serve as sites for the pilot program.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 167 (S.B. 2158), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2023.

Sec. 19.006. GRANTS AND FEDERAL FUNDS. (a) The district may accept a grant from a public or private organization and may spend those funds to operate district programs and provide district services.

(b) The district may accept federal funds and shall use those funds in compliance with applicable federal law, regulations, and guidelines.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 19.007. COSTS TO BE BORNE BY STATE. (a) Except as authorized by Section 19.006 and this section, the state shall pay the cost of operating the district.

(b) The costs for persons eligible under Section 19.005 shall be paid from the foundation school fund.

(c) In addition to money from the foundation school fund, the district may receive appropriated money from the department for educational programs.

(d) The operating costs of the district may not be charged to another school district.

(e) The district may participate in the instructional materials program under Chapter 31.

(f) In addition to other amounts received by the district under this section, the district is entitled to state aid in an amount equal to the product of $2,000 multiplied by the number of classroom teachers, full-time librarians, full-time school counselors certified under Subchapter B, Chapter 21, and full-time school nurses who are employed by the district and who would be entitled to a minimum salary under Section 21.402 if employed by a school district operating under Chapter 11.

(g) In addition to other amounts received by the district under this section, the district is entitled to state aid in the amount necessary to fund the salary increases required by Section 19.009(d-2).

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of any budget reductions requested by the Legislative Budget Board or the governor, any money received by the district or appropriated to the department for purposes of operating the district is considered to be part of the foundation school program and is not subject to those budget reductions.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1071, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 4.03, eff. May 31, 2006.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1328 (H.B. 3646), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 6), Sec. 11, eff. July 19, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 5, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 489 (H.B. 3456), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2021.

Sec. 19.008. ALLOCATION OF COSTS. (a) The commissioner shall allocate funds to the district from the foundation school fund based on an amount, established in the General Appropriations Act, for each contact hour between a teacher and a person eligible under Section 19.005, including associated administrative costs, for the best 180 of 210 school days in each year of the state fiscal biennium. Those funds may be spent only for district administrative costs related to education and for district educational programs and services and only with the approval of the board.

(b) The agency by rule shall establish a time and manner for the district to report and verify contact hours to the agency.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 19.009. DISTRICT EMPLOYEES. (a) District employees are not considered employees of the state except as provided for in this section. The board may establish personnel policies as necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the district.

(b) Each employee of the district shall serve 220 or 226 days each year, based on position, as determined by the board.

(c) A district employee required under Subchapter B, Chapter 21, to hold a certificate must be certified in accordance with that subchapter.

(d) Each employee shall be paid according to a salary schedule approved by the board. The schedule may allow for salary differentiation that provides for salaries at a Windham School District school site to be commensurate with educator salaries in school districts contiguous to that school site.

(d-1) Each school year, the district shall pay an amount at least equal to $2,000 to each classroom teacher, full-time librarian, full-time school counselor certified under Subchapter B, Chapter 21, and full-time school nurse who is employed by the district and who would be entitled to a minimum salary under Section 21.402 if employed by a school district operating under Chapter 11. A payment under this section is in addition to wages the district would otherwise pay the employee during the school year.

(d-2) Beginning with the 2009-2010 school year, the district shall increase the monthly salary of each classroom teacher, full-time speech pathologist, full-time librarian, full-time school counselor certified under Subchapter B, Chapter 21, and full-time school nurse employed by the district by the greater of:

(1) $80; or

(2) the maximum uniform amount that, when combined with any resulting increases in the amount of contributions made by the district for social security coverage for the specified employees or by the district on behalf of the specified employees under Section 825.405, Government Code, may be provided using an amount equal to the product of $60 multiplied by the number of students in weighted average daily attendance in the district during the 2009-2010 school year.

(d-3) A payment under Subsection (d-2) is in addition to salary the district would otherwise pay the employees during the school year.

(e) Each employee of the district who qualifies for membership in the Teacher Retirement System of Texas shall be covered under the system to the same extent a qualified employee of any other district is covered.

(f) The state minimum personal leave program under Section 22.003 applies to a district employee in the same manner as that program applies to an employee of any other school district.

(g) The employees of the district are eligible for workers' compensation benefits under Chapter 501, Labor Code, and for group benefits under Chapter 1551, Insurance Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 10A.510, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 4.04, eff. May 31, 2006.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1328 (H.B. 3646), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 6, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 19.010. STRATEGIC PLAN AND ANNUAL REPORT. (a) The district shall propose, and the board shall adopt with any modification the board finds necessary, a strategic plan that includes:

(1) a mission statement relating to the goals and duties of the district under this chapter;

(2) goals to be met by the district in carrying out the mission stated; and

(3) specific educational, vocational training, and counseling programs to be conducted by the district to meet the goals stated in the plan.

(b) The district shall prepare a report for each fiscal year documenting district activities under the strategic plan. Not later than January 31 of each year, the district shall file the report for the preceding fiscal year with the board, the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the agency.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 19.011. COORDINATION WITH OTHER STATE AGENCIES. (a) In order to achieve the goals stated in Section 19.003, the district with the cooperation of the Health and Human Services Commission, the Texas Workforce Investment Council, the Texas Workforce Commission, the Texas Economic Development and Tourism Office, and the department shall provide persons confined or imprisoned in the department:

(1) information from local workforce and development boards on job training and employment referral services; and

(2) information on the tax refund voucher program under Subchapter H, Chapter 301, Labor Code.

(b) The district shall coordinate vocational education and job training programs with a local workforce development board authorized by the Texas Workforce Commission to ensure that district students are equipped with the skills necessary to compete for current and emerging jobs.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 818, Sec. 6.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1142 (H.B. 2837), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.